California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(H) For the 2008–09 fiscal year and every fiscal year thereafter, 50 percent of the revenue estimated pursuant to this paragraph each quarter shall, notwithstanding any other provision of this paragraph or any other provision of law, and except as provided in subparagraph (I), be transferred to the Mass Transportation Fund. Notwithstanding this requirement, for the 2008–09 fiscal year, the amount of three hundred eight million seven hundred thirty-five thousand dollars ($308,735,000) for each of the first three quarters, and the amount of one hundred fifteen million twenty-nine thousand dollars ($115,029,000) for the fourth quarter, shall be transferred to the Mass Transportation Fund. If revenue for any quarter is less than the specified amount, the transfer in the subsequent quarter or quarters shall be increased so that the total transfer for the fiscal year is one billion forty-one million two hundred thirty-four thousand dollars
 ($1,041,234,000).

(I) For the 2009–10 to 2012–13 fiscal years, inclusive, all revenue estimated pursuant to this paragraph shall, notwithstanding any other provision of this paragraph or any other provision of law, be transferred quarterly to the Mass Transportation Fund.

(2) All revenues, less refunds, derived under this part at the 434-percent rate, resulting from increasing, after December 31, 1989, the rate of tax imposed pursuant to the Motor Vehicle Fuel License Tax Law on motor vehicle fuel, as defined for purposes of that law, shall be transferred quarterly to the Public Transportation Account, a trust fund in the State Transportation Fund.

(3) All revenues, less refunds, derived under this part at the
 434-percent rate from the imposition of sales and use taxes on fuel, as defined for purposes of the Use Fuel Tax Law (Part 3 (commencing with Section 8601)) and the Diesel Fuel Tax Law (Part 31 (commencing with Section 60001)), shall be estimated by the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration with the concurrence of the Department of Finance, and shall be transferred quarterly to the Public Transportation Account, a trust fund in the State Transportation Fund.

(4) (A) All revenues, less refunds, derived under this part from the taxes imposed pursuant to Sections 6051.2 and 6201.2 shall be transferred to the Sales Tax Account of the Local Revenue Fund for allocation to cities and counties as prescribed by statute.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph
 (A), if the Director of Finance determines that the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration has allocated more revenue to the Local Revenue Fund for taxable sales that occurred during the period of July 1, 2011, through June 30, 2016, than required by subparagraph (A), the total amount of revenue credited to the Local Revenue Fund for taxable sales that occurred during the period of July 1, 2011, through June 30, 2016, for allocation to cities and counties as prescribed by statute shall be considered to have fulfilled the requirements of subparagraph (A), and an allocation adjustment for this period shall not be made.

(5) All revenues, less refunds, derived from the taxes imposed pursuant to Section 35 of Article XIII of the California Constitution shall be transferred to the Public Safety Account in the Local Public Safety Fund created in Section 30051 of the Government Code for allocation to counties as prescribed by statute.

(6) Notwithstanding paragraph (5), if the Director of Finance determines that the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration has allocated more revenue to the Public Safety Account for taxable sales that occurred during the period of July 1, 2011, through June 30, 2016, than required by paragraph (5), the total amount of revenue credited to the Public Safety Account for taxable sales that occurred during the period of July 1, 2011, through June 30, 2016, shall be considered to have fulfilled the requirements of paragraph (5), and an allocation adjustment for this period shall not be made.

(b) The balance shall be transferred to the General Fund.

(c) The estimates required by subdivision (a) shall be based on taxable transactions occurring during a calendar year, and the transfers required by subdivision (a)
 shall be made during the fiscal year that commences during that same calendar year. Transfers required by paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of subdivision (a) shall be estimated by the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, with the concurrence of the Department of Finance, and shall be made quarterly.

(d) Notwithstanding the designation of the Public Transportation Account as a trust fund pursuant to subdivision (a), the Controller may use the Public Transportation Account for loans to the General Fund as provided in Sections 16310 and 16381 of the Government Code. The loans shall be repaid with interest from the General Fund at the Pooled Money Investment Account rate.

(e) The Legislature may amend this section, by statute passed in each house of the Legislature by rollcall vote entered in the journal, two-thirds of the membership concurring, if the statute is
 consistent with, and furthers the purposes of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 186.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Note: Section 7102 was amended on June 5, 1990, by initiative Prop. 116.)
-------------------------------------------

7102.1.

(a) On and after April 1, 2023, and before April 1, 2024, the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration, with the concurrence of the Department of Finance, shall, on a quarterly basis, estimate the revenues, less refunds, that, if not for Section 6357.4, would have been derived under this part at the 434-percent rate, excluding the portion of the 434-percent rate that is deposited in the State Treasury and credited to the Local Revenue Fund 2011 pursuant to Section 6051.15 or 6201.15, from the imposition of sales and use taxes on fuel, as defined for purposes of the Diesel Fuel Tax Law (Part 31
 (commencing with Section 60001)).

(b) The Controller shall, on a quarterly basis, transfer the estimated amount from the Retail Sales Tax Fund to the Public Transportation Account, a trust fund in the State Transportation Fund.

(c) The quarterly estimates required by subdivision (a) shall be based on taxable transactions from October 1, 2022, to September 30, 2023, inclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 55, Sec. 3.   (AB 194)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

7103.

(a) For purposes of this section:

(1) “City” means a city within the geographic boundaries of a county.

(2) “Confirmed historic venue” means a historic venue that has received a confirmation by the department pursuant to subdivision (g).

(3) “County” means the County of Alameda, the County of Santa Clara, and the County of Los Angeles.

(4) “Fund” means the Historic Venue Restoration and Resiliency Fund created pursuant to subdivision (c).

(5) “Historic venue” means a venue in the state that meets all of the
 following criteria:

(A) The venue meets any of the following criteria:

(i) The venue contains a structure built before 1940.

(ii) The venue contains a structure officially designated by the United States National Park Service or the United States Department of the Interior as a National Historic Landmark.

(iii) The venue is located at a site continuously used for live, ticketed events for more than 50 years.

(B) The venue has total fixed seating capacity of at least 15,000 people.

(C) The venue hosts live entertainment or sporting events.

(D) The venue is owned
 by a public entity.

(6) “Qualified event” means a live event at a confirmed historic venue to which tickets are offered for public sale.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, a return filed with the department to report gross receipts for sales tax purposes shall, for each confirmed historic venue, segregate the taxable sales made at a qualified event on a line or a separate form, as prescribed by the department, if the place of sale in this state is on or within the real property of a confirmed historic venue on the day of a qualified event that occurred on or before June 30, 2029.

(c) (1) The Historic Venue Restoration and Resiliency Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury.

(2) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, moneys in the fund shall be continuously appropriated without regard to fiscal year and allocated pursuant to subdivisions (e) and (f).

(d) (1) The department shall, for each confirmed historic venue, report the total amount of taxable sales made at a qualified event that were segregated on the returns filed for the prior fiscal year pursuant to subdivision (b) to the Department of Finance on or before November 1 of each year.

(2) (A) The total taxable sales made at a qualified event that were reported pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be subject to review, which may be a review of a sample of returns, by the department for errors.

(B) The department shall note any errors identified in the review and the approximate impact of those errors on the total taxable sales made at a qualified event that were in the report to the Department of Finance required by this subdivision to allow an adjusted total taxable sales amount to be determined.

(e) (1) An amount equal to 5 percent of the total amount of taxable sales, or adjusted taxable sales, for the prior fiscal year reported to the Department of Finance by the department pursuant to subdivision (d) shall be included in the next annual Governor’s Budget for deposit into the fund for the Controller to allocate to cities and counties pursuant to subdivision (f).

(2) (A) No later than 15 days after enactment of the annual Budget Act, the Department of Finance shall, for each confirmed historic venue located within the geographic boundaries of a city or county, report to the Controller the amounts to be allocated from the fund to each city and county.

(B) The amounts to be allocated pursuant to subparagraph (A) to each city and county shall be in proportion to the taxable sales subject to subdivision
 (b) derived from qualified events at each confirmed historic venue identified by that city or county.

(3) No later than 30 days after the enactment of the annual Budget Act, the amount appropriated by the Legislature to the Controller pursuant to this subdivision shall be transferred by the Controller to the fund.

(f) (1) Beginning January 1, 2025, the Controller shall annually allocate, as promptly as feasible, the moneys in the fund to each city or county pursuant to the report required by paragraph (2) of subdivision (e).

(2) (A) A city or county shall distribute funds received pursuant to this subdivision only for any of the following purposes and pursuant to subparagraph (B):

(i) Capital infrastructure improvements and preservation of a confirmed historic venue.

(ii) Preventive maintenance of a confirmed historic venue related to patrons safety.

(iii) Technological improvements at a confirmed historic venue.

(iv) Security enhancements at a confirmed historic venue.

(v) Bringing a confirmed historic venue into compliance with the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.).

(vi) Energy efficiency improvements at a confirmed historic venue.

(vii) Upgrades related to implementation of federal and state policies at a confirmed historic venue.

(B) A city or county shall distribute funds to each confirmed historic venue within the geographic boundaries of that city or county in accordance with the amounts allocated by the Controller for that purpose pursuant to paragraph (1).

(g) (1) (A) A city or county shall identify a historic venue within its jurisdiction to the department, in a form and manner prescribed by the department, for a confirmation as a historic venue.

(B) (i) Subject to clause (ii), if the venue identified pursuant to subparagraph (A) is a historic venue, the department shall issue a confirmation to the city or county as promptly as feasible.

(ii) The department shall not issue a confirmation pursuant to
 clause (i) if a city or county is currently receiving revenue transmitted pursuant to subdivision (f) with respect to the historic venue.

(2) A city or county, or its designee, that receives a confirmation from the department pursuant to paragraph (1) shall, at least 10 days before a qualified event scheduled to take place at a confirmed historic venue within the geographic boundaries of that city or county, notify any retailers subject to subdivision (b) that the city or county, or its designee, knows, or has reason to know, will be making sales during that qualified event of their reporting obligation pursuant to subdivision (b).

(h) On or before November 1 of each year, the department shall deliver a report to the Assembly Committee on Revenue and Taxation and the Senate Committee on Governance and Finance concerning both of the following:

(1) The identity of any confirmed historic venue and the city or county that identified that venue pursuant to subdivision (g).

(2) (A) The amount of revenue allocated in the preceding fiscal year pursuant to this section to a city or county with respect to each confirmed historic venue.

(B) On or before September 1 of each year, the Controller shall provide to the department the information required to be included in the report pursuant to subparagraph (A).

(i) This section shall remain operative only until November 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 34, Sec. 14.   (SB 167)   Effective June 27, 2024.   Repealed as of November 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7104.

(a) The Transportation Investment Fund (hereafter the fund) is hereby created in the State Treasury. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated without regard to fiscal years for
 disbursement in the manner and for the purposes set forth in this section.

(b) All of the following shall occur on a quarterly basis:

(1) The State Board of Equalization, in consultation with the Department of Finance, shall estimate the amount that is transferred to the General Fund under subdivision (b) of Section 7102 that is attributable to revenue collected for the sale, storage, use, or other consumption in this state of motor vehicle fuel, as defined in Section 7326.

(2) The State Board of Equalization shall inform the Controller, in writing, of the amount estimated under paragraph (1).

(3) Commencing with the 2003–04 fiscal year, the Controller shall transfer the amount estimated under paragraph (1) from the General Fund to the fund.

(c) For each quarter during the period commencing on July 1, 2003, and ending on June 30, 2008, the Controller shall make all of the following transfers and apportionments from the funds identified for transfer under paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) in the following order:

(1) To the Traffic Congestion Relief Fund created in the State Treasury by Section 14556.5 of the Government Code, the sum of one hundred sixty-nine million five hundred thousand dollars ($169,500,000), except that the transfer for the final quarter shall be ninety-three million four hundred thousand dollars ($93,400,000), for a total transfer of three billion three hundred thirteen million nine hundred thousand dollars ($3,313,900,000).

(2) To the Public Transportation Account, a trust fund in the State Transportation Fund, 20 percent of the amount
 remaining after the transfer required under paragraph (1). Funds transferred under this paragraph shall be made available as follows:

(A) To the Department of Transportation, 50 percent for purposes of subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 99315 of the Public Utilities Code, subject to appropriation by the Legislature.

(B) To the Controller, 25 percent for allocation pursuant to Section 99314 of the Public Utilities Code. Funds allocated under this subparagraph shall be subject to all of the provisions governing funds allocated under Section 99314 of the Public Utilities Code. For the 2007–08 fiscal year, these funds are continuously appropriated to the Controller for purposes of this subparagraph.

(C) To the Controller, 25 percent for allocation pursuant to Section 99313 of the Public Utilities Code. Funds allocated
 under this subparagraph shall be subject to all of the provisions governing funds allocated under Section 99313 of the Public Utilities Code. For the 2007–08 fiscal year, these funds are continuously appropriated to the Controller for purposes of this subparagraph.

(3) To the Department of Transportation for expenditure for programming for transportation capital improvement projects subject to all of the provisions governing the State Transportation Improvement Program, 40 percent of the amount remaining after the transfer required under paragraph (1), except that in the 2006–07 and 2007–08 fiscal years, the transfer shall be 80 percent of the amount remaining after the transfer required under paragraph (1).

(4) To the Controller for apportionment to the counties, including a city and county, 20 percent of the amount remaining after the transfer required under paragraph (1),
 except that in the 2006–07 and 2007–08 fiscal years, no transfer may be made under this paragraph. Funds transferred under this paragraph shall be allocated in accordance with the following formulas:

(A) Seventy-five percent of the funds payable under this paragraph shall be apportioned among the counties in the proportion that the number of fee-paid and exempt vehicles that are registered in the county bears to the number of fee-paid and exempt vehicles registered in the state.

(B) Twenty-five percent of the funds payable under this paragraph shall be apportioned among the counties in the proportion that the number of miles of maintained county roads in each county bears to the total number of miles of maintained county roads in the state. For the purposes of apportioning funds under this subparagraph, any roads within the boundaries of a city and county that are not state
 highways shall be deemed to be county roads.

(5) To the Controller for apportionment to cities, including a city and county, 20 percent of the amount remaining after the transfer required under paragraph (1), except that in the 2006–07 and 2007–08 fiscal years, no transfer may be made under this paragraph. Funds transferred under this paragraph shall be apportioned among the cities in the proportion that the total population of the city bears to the total population of all the cities in the state.

(d) Funds received under paragraph (4) or (5) of subdivision (c) shall be deposited as follows in order to avoid the commingling of those funds with other local funds:

(1) In the case of a city, into the city account that is designated for the receipt of state funds allocated for transportation purposes.

(2) In the case of a county, into the county road fund.

(3) In the case of a city and county, into a local account that is designated for the receipt of state funds allocated for transportation purposes.

(e) Funds allocated to a city, county, or city and county under paragraph (4) or (5) of subdivision (c) shall be used only for street and highway maintenance, rehabilitation, reconstruction, and storm damage repair. For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Maintenance” means either or both of the following:

(A) Patching.

(B) Overlay and sealing.

(2) “Reconstruction” includes any overlay, sealing, or widening of the roadway, if the widening is necessary to bring the roadway width to the desirable minimum width consistent with the geometric design criteria of the department for 3R (reconstruction, resurfacing, and rehabilitation) projects that are not on a freeway, but does not include widening for the purpose of increasing the traffic capacity of a street or highway.

(3) “Storm damage repair” is repair or reconstruction of local streets and highways and related drainage improvements that have been damaged due to winter storms and flooding, and construction of drainage improvements to mitigate future roadway flooding and damage problems, in those jurisdictions that have been declared disaster areas by the President of the United States, where the costs of those repairs are ineligible for emergency funding with Federal
 Emergency Relief (ER) funds or Federal Emergency Management Administration (FEMA) funds.

(f) (1) Cities and counties shall maintain their existing commitment of local funds for street and highway maintenance, rehabilitation, reconstruction, and storm damage repair in order to remain eligible for the allocation of funds pursuant to paragraph (4) or (5) of subdivision (c).

(2) In order to receive any allocation pursuant to paragraph (4) or (5) of subdivision (c), the city or county shall annually expend from its general fund for street, road, and highway purposes an amount not less than the annual average of its expenditures from its general fund during the 1996–97, 1997–98, and 1998–99 fiscal years, as reported to the Controller pursuant to Section 2151 of the Streets and Highways Code. For purposes of this paragraph, in calculating a city’s or county’s annual
 general fund expenditures and its average general fund expenditures for the 1996–97, 1997–98, and 1998–99 fiscal years, any unrestricted funds that the city or county may expend at its discretion, including vehicle in-lieu tax revenues and revenues from fines and forfeitures, expended for street and highway purposes shall be considered expenditures from the general fund. One-time allocations that have been expended for street and highway purposes, but which may not be available on an ongoing basis, including revenue provided under the Teeter Plan Bond Law of 1994 (Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 54773) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code), may not be considered when calculating a city’s or county’s annual general fund expenditures.

(3) For any city incorporated after July 1, 1996, the Controller shall calculate an annual average of expenditure for the period between July 1, 1996, and December 31, 2000, inclusive, that
 the city was incorporated.

(4) For purposes of paragraph (2), the Controller may request fiscal data from cities and counties in addition to data provided pursuant to Section 2151, for the 1996–97, 1997–98, and 1998–99 fiscal years. Each city and county shall furnish the data to the Controller not later than 120 days after receiving the request. The Controller may withhold payment to cities and counties that do not comply with the request for information or that provide incomplete data.

(5) The Controller may perform audits to ensure compliance with paragraph (2) when deemed necessary. Any city or county that has not complied with paragraph (2) shall reimburse the state for the funds it received during that fiscal year. Any funds withheld or returned as a result of a failure to comply with paragraph (2) shall be reallocated to the other counties and cities whose expenditures are
 in compliance.

(6) If a city or county fails to comply with the requirements of paragraph (2) in a particular fiscal year, the city or county may expend during that fiscal year and the following fiscal year a total amount that is not less than the total amount required to be expended for those fiscal years for purposes of complying with paragraph (2).

(7) The allocation made under paragraph (4) or (5) of subdivision (c) shall be expended not later than the end of the fiscal year following the fiscal year in which the allocation was made, and any funds not expended within that period shall be returned to the Controller and shall be reallocated to the other cities and counties pursuant to the allocation formulas set forth in paragraph (4) or (5) of subdivision (c).

(g) The Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation
 Authority shall give first priority for using its share of the funds made available under subparagraphs (B) and (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) to providing the levels of bus service mandated under the consent decree entered into by the authority on October 29, 1996, in the case of Labor/Community Strategy Center, et al. v. Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority.

(h) (1) For the purpose of allocating funds under paragraph (4) or (5) of subdivision (c) to counties, cities, and a city and county, the Controller shall use the most recent population estimates prepared by the Demographic Research Unit of the Department of Finance. For a city that incorporated after January 1, 1998, that does not appear on the most recent population estimates prepared by the Demographic Research Unit, the Controller shall use the population determined for that city under Section 11005.3 of the Revenue and Taxation
 Code.

(2) The amendments made to Section 11005.3 by the act adding this paragraph shall not apply to a population determination under paragraph (1).

(i) This section shall become inoperative on the date that all encumbrances incurred for the projects funded under paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) have been liquidated or on June 30, 2008, whichever date is later, and as of the January 1 immediately following that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 274.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.   Inoperative on June 30, 2008, or later date, as provided in subd. (i).   Repealed, by its own provisions, on January 1 following inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

7104.1.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the requirements imposed on cities and counties by subdivision (f) of Section 7104 shall not apply for any fiscal year in which the transfer of revenues from the General Fund to the Transportation Investment Fund is suspended pursuant to Article XIXB of the California Constitution and funds consequently are not made available for allocation to cities or counties pursuant to paragraphs (4) and (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 7104.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 716, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

7104.2.

(a) The Transportation Investment Fund (hereafter the fund) in the State Treasury is hereby continued in existence. All revenues transferred to the fund pursuant to Article XIXB of the California Constitution beginning with the 2008–09 fiscal year shall be available for expenditure as provided in this section. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code or any other
 provision of law, moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated without regard to fiscal years for disbursement in the manner and for the purposes set forth in this section.

(b) All of the following shall occur on a quarterly basis:

(1) The State Board of Equalization, in consultation with the Department of Finance, shall estimate the amount that is transferred to the General Fund under subdivision (b) of Section 7102 that is attributable to revenue collected for the sale, storage, use, or other consumption in this state of motor vehicle fuel, as defined in Section 7326.

(2) The State Board of Equalization shall inform the Controller, in writing, of the amount estimated under paragraph (1).

(3) Commencing with the 2008–09 fiscal year, the Controller
 shall transfer the amount estimated under paragraph (1) from the General Fund to the fund.

(c) For each quarter, commencing with the 2008–09 fiscal year, the Controller shall make all of the following transfers and apportionments from the fund:

(1) To the Public Transportation Account, a trust fund in the State Transportation Fund, 20 percent of the revenues deposited in the fund. Funds transferred under this paragraph shall be made available as follows:

(A) Twenty-five percent for purposes of Section 99315 of the Public Utilities Code, subject to appropriation by the Legislature.

(B) Thirty-seven and one-half percent to the Controller, for allocation pursuant to Section 99314 of the Public Utilities Code. Funds allocated under this subparagraph shall
 be subject to all of the provisions governing funds allocated under Section 99314 of the Public Utilities Code. These funds are continuously appropriated to the Controller for purposes of this subparagraph.

(C) Thirty-seven and one-half percent to the Controller, for allocation pursuant to Section 99313 of the Public Utilities Code. Funds allocated under this subparagraph shall be subject to all of the provisions governing funds allocated under Section 99313 of the Public Utilities Code. These funds are continuously appropriated to the Controller for purposes of this subparagraph.

(D) Notwithstanding subparagraphs (A), (B), and (C), for the 2009–10 to 2012–13 fiscal years, inclusive, all funds transferred under this paragraph shall be made available only for purposes of Section 99315 of the Public Utilities Code, subject to appropriation by the Legislature.

(2) To the Department of Transportation for expenditure for transportation capital improvement projects subject to all of the rules governing the State Transportation Improvement Program, 40 percent of the revenues deposited in the fund.

(3) To the Controller for apportionment pursuant to subparagraphs (A) and (B), 40 percent of the revenues deposited in the fund.

(A) Of the amount available under this paragraph, 50 percent shall be apportioned by the Controller to the counties, including a city and county, in accordance with the following formulas:

(i) Seventy-five percent of the funds payable under this subparagraph shall be apportioned among the counties in the proportion that the number of fee-paid and exempt vehicles that are registered in the county
 bears to the number of fee-paid and exempt vehicles registered in the state.

(ii) Twenty-five percent of the funds payable under this subparagraph shall be apportioned among the counties in the proportion that the number of miles of maintained county roads in each county bears to the total number of miles of maintained county roads in the state. For the purposes of apportioning funds under this subparagraph, any roads within the boundaries of a city and county that are not state highways shall be deemed to be county roads.

(B) Of the amount available under this paragraph, 50 percent shall be apportioned by the Controller to cities, including a city and county, in the proportion that the total population of the city bears to the total population of all the cities in the state.

(d) Funds received under subparagraph (A)
 or (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) shall be deposited as follows in order to avoid the commingling of those funds with other local funds:

(1) In the case of a city, into the city account that is designated for the receipt of state funds allocated for transportation purposes.

(2) In the case of a county, into the county road fund.

(3) In the case of a city and county, into a local account that is designated for the receipt of state funds allocated for transportation purposes.

(e) Funds allocated to a city, county, or city and county under subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) shall be used only for street and highway maintenance, rehabilitation, reconstruction, and storm damage repair. For purposes of this section, the
 following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Maintenance” means either or both of the following:

(A) Patching.

(B) Overlay and sealing.

(2) “Reconstruction” includes any overlay, sealing, or widening of the roadway, if the widening is necessary to bring the roadway width to the desirable minimum width consistent with the geometric design criteria of the department for 3R (reconstruction, resurfacing, and rehabilitation) projects that are not on a freeway, but does not include widening for the purpose of increasing the traffic capacity of a street or highway.

(3) “Storm damage repair” is repair or reconstruction of local streets and highways and related drainage improvements that have
 been damaged due to winter storms and flooding, and construction of drainage improvements to mitigate future roadway flooding and damage problems, in those jurisdictions that have been declared disaster areas by the President of the United States, where the costs of those repairs are ineligible for emergency funding with Federal Emergency Relief (ER) funds or Federal Emergency Management Administration (FEMA) funds.

(f) (1) Cities and counties shall maintain their existing commitment of local funds for street and highway maintenance, rehabilitation, reconstruction, and storm damage repair in order to remain eligible for the allocation of funds pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (c).

(2) In order to receive any allocation pursuant to subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (c), the city or county shall annually
 expend from its general fund for street, road, and highway purposes an amount not less than the annual average of its expenditures from its general fund during the 1996–97, 1997–98, and 1998–99 fiscal years, as reported to the Controller pursuant to Section 2151 of the Streets and Highways Code. For purposes of this paragraph, in calculating a city’s or county’s annual general fund expenditures and its average general fund expenditures for the 1996–97, 1997–98, and 1998–99 fiscal years, any unrestricted funds that the city or county may expend at its discretion, including vehicle in-lieu tax revenues and revenues from fines and forfeitures, expended for street and highway purposes shall be considered expenditures from the general fund. One-time allocations that have been expended for street and highway purposes, but which may not be available on an ongoing basis, including revenue provided under the Teeter Plan Bond Law of 1994 (Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 54773) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5
 of the Government Code), may not be considered when calculating a city’s or county’s annual general fund expenditures.

(3) For any city incorporated after July 1, 1996, the Controller shall calculate an annual average of expenditure for the period between July 1, 1996, and December 31, 2000, inclusive, that the city was incorporated.

(4) For purposes of paragraph (2), the Controller may request fiscal data from cities and counties in addition to data provided pursuant to Section 2151, for the 1996–97, 1997–98, and 1998–99 fiscal years. Each city and county shall furnish the data to the Controller not later than 120 days after receiving the request. The Controller may withhold payment to cities and counties that do not comply with the request for information or that provide incomplete data.

(5) The Controller may
 perform audits to ensure compliance with paragraph (2) when deemed necessary. Any city or county that has not complied with paragraph (2) shall reimburse the state for the funds it received during that fiscal year. Any funds withheld or returned as a result of a failure to comply with paragraph (2) shall be reallocated to the other counties and cities whose expenditures are in compliance.

(6) If a city or county fails to comply with the requirements of paragraph (2) in a particular fiscal year, the city or county may expend during that fiscal year and the following fiscal year a total amount that is not less than the total amount required to be expended for those fiscal years for purposes of complying with paragraph (2).

(7) The allocation made under subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) shall be expended not later than the end of the fiscal year following
 the fiscal year in which the allocation was made, and any funds not expended within that period shall be returned to the Controller and shall be reallocated to the other cities and counties pursuant to the allocation formulas set forth in subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (c).

(g) For the purpose of allocating funds under subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) to counties, cities, and a city and county, the Controller shall use the most recent population estimates prepared by the Demographic Research Unit of the Department of Finance. For a city that incorporated after January 1, 2008, that does not appear on the most recent population estimates prepared by the Demographic Research Unit, the Controller shall use the population determined for that city under Section 11005.3.

(h) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, the
 quarterly apportionments scheduled to be made in October 2009 and January 2010 pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) shall be suspended and deferred until May 31, 2010.

(2) For the purpose of meeting the cash obligations associated with ongoing budgeted costs, a city or county may make use of any cash balance in its city or county road fund, including that resulting from the receipt of funds pursuant to the Highway Safety, Traffic Reduction, Air Quality, and Port Security Bond Act of 2006 (Chapter 12.49 (commencing with Section 8879.20) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code (hereafter bond act)) for local street and road maintenance, during the period of this suspension, without the use of this cash being reflected as an expenditure of bond act funds, provided the cash is replaced once this suspension is repaid. Nothing in this paragraph shall change the fact that expenditures must be accrued and reflected from the appropriate
 funding sources for which the moneys were received and meet all requirements of those funding sources.

(i) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Controller may use the funds in the Transportation Investment Fund for cashflow loans to the General Fund as provided in Sections 16310 and 16381 of the Government Code. Any such loan shall be exempt from paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 16310 of the Government Code. Interest shall be paid on all moneys loaned to the General Fund and shall be computed at a rate determined by the Pooled Money Investment Board to be the current earning rate of the fund from which the money is loaned. This subdivision does not authorize any transfer that would interfere with the carrying out of the object for which these funds were created.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 1, Sec. 5.   (SB 95)   Effective February 3, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

7104.3.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, upon order of the Department of Finance, all or some of the state agencies collecting revenue for, or spending from, the Transportation Investment Fund shall adjust budgeting, accounting, and reporting systems and documents so that unliquidated encumbrances, payables, and other accruals are not reflected in the fund balance in the Governor’s Budget fund
 condition display or the fund balance in the financial statements submitted to the Controller for the budgetary-legal basis annual report.

(b) For the purposes of the Governor’s Budget, the balance of cash advanced from the Transportation Investment Fund to the Transportation Revolving Account, as jointly determined by the Department of Finance and the state agencies referenced in subdivision (a), shall be deemed as resources and cash available to the Transportation Investment Fund for budgeting purposes.

(c) This method shall be effective with the 2013–14 Governor’s Budget development process and may be applied to the 2011–12 data.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 35, Sec. 9.   (SB 85)   Effective June 27, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

7104.4.

(a) The State Highway Account in the State Transportation Fund is the successor account to the Transportation Investment Fund.
